Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
PART 2
REQUIRED DISCLOSURES

6-13-201. Filing and online publication of contracts and royalty schedules.

A performing rights society shall annually file with the secretary of state an electronic copy of each form contract licensing the public performance of the nondramatic musical works in the performing rights society's repertory to proprietors in the state of Colorado, together with the applicable schedule of royalty rates payable under each form contract. The secretary of state shall post the information filed in accordance with this subsection (1) on the secretary of state's website. The secretary of state has no duty to determine whether the documents filed comply with the requirements of this article 13 or to determine the performing rights society's compliance with this article 13.

A performing rights society shall also make available, at no charge, both the contracts and schedules of royalty rates that are required to be filed with the secretary of state in accordance with subsection (1) of this section to any proprietor within Colorado via a link to the society's website from the secretary of state's website.

Upon request of the secretary of state, each performing rights society shall provide to the secretary of state information on a proprietor's rights and responsibilities regarding the public performance of nondramatic musical works, and the secretary of state shall post the information on the secretary of state's website.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (HB 17-1092), ch. 78, p. 246, § 4, effective August 9.

6-13-202. Catalog of musical works - publication by performing rights society.

A performing rights society shall publish a list online of all nondramatic musical works the performing rights society licenses for performance in a retail establishment.

To comply with this section, the list of nondramatic musical works must be:

Updated within thirty business days after adding or subtracting a nondramatic musical work; and

Made available, without charge, to any proprietor within Colorado and to the secretary of state on a website or using a substantially similar or superior technology for communicating the information, at no charge, to the public.

A performing rights society licensing musical works in Colorado shall file the address of the website or substantially similar or superior technology with the secretary of state, who shall publish the website address of the list published in accordance with subsection (1)(a) of this section on the secretary of state's website or using a substantially similar or superior technology for communicating the information, at no charge, to the public.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (HB 17-1092), ch. 78, p. 247, § 4, effective August 9.

6-13-203. Violations.

A performing rights society shall not enter into a contract that is subject to this article 13 without either:

Publishing the disclosures required by this part 2; or

Making the filings required by this part 2.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (HB 17-1092), ch. 78, p. 247, § 4, effective August 9.

6-13-204. Royalties and catalog of musical works - material information.

The contracts and schedule of royalties submitted to the secretary of state in accordance with section 6-13-201 and the list of all nondramatic musical works published online in accordance with section 6-13-202 constitute material information for purposes of section 6-1-105 (1)(u).

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part added, (HB 17-1092), ch. 78, p. 247, § 4, effective August 9.